Tennessee, session 114, HB2325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-102(a)(2), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(2) The amount of such tax shall be fixed by the county legislative body of each
county; provided, that the amount of such tax shall not exceed three dollars ($3.00) per
hundred dollars of assessed value.
SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-103(a), is amended by
designating the existing language as subdivision (1) and adding the following as a new
subdivision:
(2) A municipality shall not fix the amount of such tax at a rate that exceeds two
dollars and fifty cents ($2.50) per hundred dollars of assessed value.
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 67-5-1702, is amended by
designating the existing language as subsection (a) and adding the following as a new
subsection:
(b) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a county or municipality shall not fix a tax
rate that exceeds the limitations in § 67-5-102(a)(2) or § 67-5-103(a)(2).
SECTION 4. This act takes effect January 1, 2027, the public welfare requiring it.
HB2325
012170
- 1 -